Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3606
Rules and regulations.

The Secretary of State may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 76-3601 to 76-3606.

Laws 2021, LB423, § 6.